Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Privatization Contracts

45A.550.
Definitions for KRS 45A.550 to 45A.554 and KRS 11A.130.

As used in KRS

45A.550

to

45A.554

and KRS

11A.130

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Privatize” means to contract out in order to procure the services of a private vendor to provide a service that is similar to, and in lieu of, a service provided by state employees of the privatizing agency;

“Privatization contract” means an agreement or combination of a series of agreements by which a private vendor agrees to provide services that are substantially similar to, and in lieu of, services previously provided, in whole or in part, by at least ten (10) permanent, full-time, budgeted employees of the state agency. This term includes but is not limited to concession contracts. This term does not include personal service contracts as defined in KRS

45A.690

, contracts entered into pursuant to KRS Chapter 176, 177, 178, 179, 180, or 181, Medicaid provider contracts, architect and engineering contracts entered into pursuant to KRS

45A.800

to

45A.835

, price contracts, construction contracts, or memoranda of understanding or memoranda of agreements or program administration contracts with the Cabinet for Human Resources, including contracts for child support collections and enforcement with contracting officials as authorized by KRS

205.712

; and

“Services” shall not include administration and support functions of government. “Administration and support functions” shall include, but not be limited to, construction contracts, bond counsel and bond underwriting services, architect and engineering services, price contracts, personal service contracts, and memoranda of understanding and memoranda of agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 492, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.551.
Procedures for state agency privatization contracts.

Upon approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, a state agency may enter into a privatization contract.

Before a state agency recommends to the Finance and Administration Cabinet that it enter into a privatization contract, the state agency shall determine and set forth in writing:

The necessity for the service and the intended goals of the service;

Problems and inefficiencies existing with the current governmental operation of the service; and

Whether the service can efficiently be provided by the agency.

If the state agency determines that the service cannot efficiently be provided by the agency, the state agency shall be permitted to continue the normal contracting process for the service. However, if the state agency determines that the service can efficiently be provided by the agency and the state agency chooses to proceed with privatization, it shall set forth in writing to the Finance and Administration Cabinet:

The tangible benefits of privatizing the service;

Any state or federal legal restraints that may limit or prevent privatization of the government service;

The availability of multiple qualified and competitive private vendors;

A cost-benefit analysis comparison that shall include, but not be limited to, collection and analysis of the total assessible fixed and variable, direct and indirect, costs of:

The current governmental operation; and

The private vendor contract.

The costs shall include, but not be limited to:

Facility and equipment maintenance;

Inflation-adjusted costs, where comparison to past years is being conducted;

Transition costs associated with shifting the service delivery from the government agency to a private vendor;

Costs of monitoring, evaluating, and enforcing the contract;

Personnel costs such as those providing for benefits, early retirements, retraining, and relocation in another position; and

A plan for resuming government operation of the service if the privatization effort fails.

A plan of assistance for all state employees who will be adversely affected by privatizing the service. The plan shall include at least:

Efforts to place affected employees in vacant positions in another state agency and to retrain employees for another position in state government;

Provisions in the contract, if feasible, for the hiring by the contractor of displaced employees at wages and benefits comparable to the wages and benefits paid to the state employees, subject to the provisions of KRS

11A.130

; and

Prior notification to affected state employees the day the contract is signed, or three (3) months before the day the adverse effect will occur, whichever is earlier.

A process for monitoring, evaluating, and enforcing a contract with a private vendor which shall include, but not be limited to:

Development of a method for ongoing, comprehensive performance evaluation of the private vendor; and

Establishment of performance criteria and standards to evaluate the private vendor.

All information required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be submitted to the Finance and Administration Cabinet for its review and approval prior to proceeding with the contracting provisions of KRS Chapter 45A.

The state agency shall retain responsibility for ensuring the quality and reliability of the services.

All records in the possession of a state agency in conjunction with the approval, evaluation, or enforcement of a privatization contract unless exempt under another statute shall be public records, access to which shall be governed by KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

Any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding, all records prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by a state agency in conjunction with the approval, evaluation, or enforcement of a privatization contract shall be public records, access to which shall be governed by KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 492, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.552.
Cabinet to develop process for evaluating information when determining whether to approve privatization contract — Administrative regulations.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall develop an objective and systematic process for evaluating the information in KRS 45A.551(2) and (3) for use in determining whether to approve privatization of a government service.

The process shall be adopted by administrative regulation promulgated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 492, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.553.
Contracting agency evaluation and report — Cabinet report.

After approval of a privatization contract by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and issuance and execution of the privatization contract, the contracting agency shall annually evaluate the performance of the contract and report its findings to the Governor, the Auditor of Public Accounts, and the Legislative Research Commission.

The state agency entering into the contract shall provide for an evaluation of the performance of any privatization contract awarded in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually. The review shall include but not be limited to determining whether the contractor is complying with all applicable statutory requirements and the provisions of the contract. The performance evaluation shall be forwarded to the Auditor of Public Accounts and the Legislative Research Commission. The evaluation shall be subject to review by the Auditor of Public Accounts, who shall report any findings to the Legislative Research Commission.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report the number of individuals working the equivalent of full-time hours under contracts or agreements identified by this section to the Legislative Research Commission on an annual basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 492, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 55, § 2, effective April 5, 2010.

45A.554.
Construction of KRS 45A.550 to 45A.554 and KRS 11A.130.

The provision of KRS

45A.550

to

45A.554

and KRS

11A.130

shall not apply to privatization contracts awarded prior to July 15, 1998, or any renewals thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 492, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.